Maine, session 132, LD1409.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4005-G, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 411, §11, is amended
to read:
1. Kinship preference. Except as provided in subsections 3, 5 and, 6 and 7, in the
residential placement of a child, the department shall give preference to an adult relative
over a nonrelated caregiver when determining placement for a child, as long as the adult
relative meets all relevant state child protection standards.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4005-G, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Foster parent rights. The department is required to consider a foster parent who
is not a relative and who has had a child placed in that foster parent's home for a continuous
period of one year or more to have the same rights as an adult relative of the child.